Massachusetts, session 194th, H2291.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following new subsection: -  
(d) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall develop and 
promulgate regulations to allow a municipality affected by the zoning provisions of this section 
to appeal for relief from such provisions based on one or more of the following: (1) The inability 
to meet the drinking water supply requirements necessary to support the housing units authorized 
by such provisions; (2) The inability to meet the wastewater treatment requirements necessary to 
support such units; (3) The inability of municipal transportation infrastructure to safely 
accommodate increased population attributable to housing development pursuant to such 
provisions; (4) Any adverse environmental impacts attributable to the developments of housing 
units pursuant to such provisions; or (5) Any adverse impacts on historical properties.